dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX C 0 sang/BY [aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sangi/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sani/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sas/BY [aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sasek/mX o POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 saseku/mX [^aeiou] POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 sasekw/mX [ae] POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 sasi/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 saw/BY [ae] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 saw/BY [aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 saw/BY o PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sawa/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sawu/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 say/BY [aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayi/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayo/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT
PFX C 0 sayob/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayob/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayoba/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayobu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayobw/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayok/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 sayok/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayoku/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 sayoku/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokub/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokub/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuba/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokubu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokubw/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuk/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuku/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokukw/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokul/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokul/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuli/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokulu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokulw/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokum/sY . PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokun/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokung/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokungi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuni/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokus/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokusi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuw/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuw/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuw/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuwa/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuwu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuy/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuyi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuz/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokuzi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayokw/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 sayokw/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayol/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayol/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayoli/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayolu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayolw/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayom/sY . PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayon/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayong/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayongi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayoni/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayos/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayosi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayow/sY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayow/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayow/sY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayowa/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayowu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayoy/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayoyi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayoz/sY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayozi/sY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuba/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayubu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuku/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukub/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukub/nY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuba/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukubu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukubw/nY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuk/nY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuku/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukukw/nY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukul/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukul/nY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuli/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukulu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukulw/nY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukum/nY . PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukun/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukung/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukungi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuni/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukus/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukusi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuw/nY [ae] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuw/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuw/nY o PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuwa/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuwu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuy/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuyi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuz/nY [aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayukuzi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuli/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayulu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayum/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayungi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuni/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayusi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuwa/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuwu/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuyi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sayuzi/nY [^aeiou] PROG_REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 saz/BY [aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazi/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazo/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT
PFX C 0 sazob/sY [aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazob/sY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazoba/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazobu/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazobw/sY [ae] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazok/sY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 sazok/sY o PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sazoku/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 sazoku/sY [^aeiou] PROG_NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
