dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
ahluka/BC
ala/BCY
ambatha/BC
anelisa/BC
aphuka/BC
babaza/BC
balekela/BC
bandla/BC
bavula/BC
bekezela/BC
bethelela/BC
bhaja/BC
bhangqa/BC
bhebheza/BC
bhekana/BC
bhikla/BC
bhodloka/BC
bhozomela/BC
bhuluka/BC
bika/BC
biya/BC
bonakala/BC
bophela/BC
bukeka/BC
bungaza/BC
buyela/BC
caca/BC
casha/BC
ceba/BC
chanasa/BC
chezuka/BC
chochobalisa/BC
chwensa/BC
cindezela/BC
cofa/BC
cubuza/BC
cwaninga/BC
dabula/BC
dangala/BC
dembesa/BC
dikibala/BC
dinsila/BC
dlanyaza/BC
dlokodla/BC
dlulwa/BCY
duda/BC
dumala/BC
duza/BC
eceka/BC
egcwala/BC
ehlukanisa/BC
ekhatha/BC
embesa/BC
emula/BC
encikisa/BC
enezezela/BC
enyana/BC
enzeka/BC
ephusa/BC
esabela/BC
ethamela/BC
ethusa/BC
exa/BC
fafaza/BC
fasa/BC
fica/BC
fikwa/BCY
folosa/BC
fukamela/BC
fumba/BC
fundwa/BCY
ga/BC
gadula/BC
ganda/BC
gasa/BC
gcina/BC
gembula/BC
ginqa/BC
gomothela/BC
gqika/BC
gubuza/BC
gula/BC
guqubala/BC
gwilika/BC
halalisela/BC
hila/BC
hlalwa/BCY
hlawulisa/BC
hlina/BC
hlonza/BC
hlutha/BC
hudula/BC
jeqeza/BC
juluka/BC
khabela/BC
khanga/BC
khathazwa/BCY
khiqiza/BC
khomba/BC
khubaza/BC
khulumisa/BC
khusela/BC
kikiza/BC
klolodela/BC
lalela/BC
laya/BC
lila/BC
loba/BC
luka/BC
lweza/BC
mbandaza/BC
memfuka/BC
mpempeza/BC
naphaza/BC
nconcoza/BC
nengwa/BC
ngcolisa/BC
ngqula/BC
nisela/BC
nqabela/BC
nqotshwa/BCY
ntula/BC
nxasa/BC
nyantulula/BC
nyonkela/BC
okhela/BC
onga/BCY
osulela/BCY
phakama/BC
phapha/BC
phathisa/BC
phendla/BC
pheshula/BC
phindelela/BC
phonsa/BC
phucuzeka/BC
phungula/BC
pilinga/BC
qala/BC
qaquluka/BC
qeqesha/BC
qhephuka/BC
qhudela/BC
qhwakela/BC
qondana/BC
qukula/BC
qwayiza/BC
sasazela/BC
sengwa/BC
shaluza/BC
sheba/BC
shibha/BC
shintshwa/BCY
shokobeza/BC
shunqisa/BC
shwathiza/BC
simbula/BC
siphula/BC
sohla/BC
sonta/BC
suzela/BC
tapa/BC
thakatha/BC
thandaza/BC
thayipha/BC
themeleza/BC
thiba/BC
thofoza/BC
thosa/BC
thunaza/BC
thutheleka/BC
tsaka/BC
tshuda/BC
vela/BC
vimbezela/BC
vulwa/BCY
vuthela/BC
wanga/BC
wotha/BC
xebula/BC
xhasa/BC
xina/BC
xukuza/BC
yanda/BC
yevuza/BC
yocula/BC
zalanisa/BC
zika/BC
zisa/BC
zuma/BC
PFX B 0 abangayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 angayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 el [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eliyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 engayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 engingazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 eningazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 esingayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 eyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ezingazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obungayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okungayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olungayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olw [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ow [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX O a abase . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a ase . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O u ase . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O u elise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O u engise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O i enise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O i ese . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O i esise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a ezise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a ngase . INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE+LOC_pfx
PFX O i obuse . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a okuse . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a oluse . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a ose . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O u ose . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX V 0 enge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 ezinge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 onge . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 en . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 esingesi . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 okungeku . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
